New Jersey, session 221, A283.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from gross income up to $2,500 of nonreimbursed veterinarian expenses incurred by the taxpayer for the examination and care of the taxpayers pet during the taxable year. b.    For purposes of this section: Pet means any domesticated animal owned by and normally maintained in or near the household of the taxpayer. "Veterinarian" means a veterinarian licensed to practice in the State of New Jersey. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.